Washington statutes.
RCW 15.86.130

Brand name materials list of registered materials—Application for registration—Right to enter premises—Rules—Denial/suspension/revocation of a registration, grounds.

(1) The department may establish a brand name materials list of registered materials that are approved for use in organic production, processing, or handling in accordance with the national organic program or international standards. Registration of a material on the brand name materials list is voluntary. While registration is not required for a material to be used or sold in this state, registration is necessary for a material to be included on the brand name materials list.

(2)(a) Manufacturers of materials may submit an application to the department for registration of a material on the brand name materials list. Applications must be made on a form designated by the department, and must include:

(i) The name and address of the manufacturer;

(ii) The name and address of the manufacturer's representative making the representations in the application;

(iii) The brand name that the material is sold under;

(iv) A copy of the labeling accompanying the material and a statement of all claims to be made for it, including the directions and precautions for use;

(v) The complete formula of the material, including the active and inert ingredients;

(vi) A description of the manufacturing process, including all materials used for the extraction and synthesis of the material, if appropriate;

(vii) The intended uses of the product;

(viii) The source or supplier of all ingredients;

(ix) The required fee for registration or renewal; and

(x) Any additional information required by rule.

(b) If any change to the information provided in an application occurs at any time after an application is submitted, the registrant must immediately submit corrected information to the department for review. Failure by the registrant to provide corrections to information provided in the application may result in suspension or revocation of the registration.

(c) By submitting an application for registration on the brand name materials list, the applicant expressly consents to jurisdiction of the state of Washington in all matters related to the registration.

(d) Applications for registration on the brand name materials list are governed by chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3)(a) By applying for registration on the brand name materials list, the registrant expressly grants to the department or other organic certifying agent or inspection agent approved by the national organic program the right to enter the registrant's premises during normal business hours or at other reasonable times to:

(i) Inspect the portion of the premises where the material, inputs, or ingredients are stored, produced, manufactured, packaged, or labeled;

(ii) Inspect records related to the sales, storage, production, manufacture, packaging, or labeling of the material, inputs, or ingredients; and

(iii) Obtain samples of materials, inputs, and ingredients.

(b) Should the registrant refuse to allow inspection of the premises or records or fail to provide samples, the registration on the brand name materials list is canceled. The department shall deny applications for registration where the registrant refuses to allow the inspection of the premises or records or fails to provide samples as provided in this section.

(c) Required inspections may be conducted by department personnel, by an organic certifying agent, or by another inspection agent approved by the national organic program. The department may establish by rule evaluation criteria for review of inspection reports conducted by an organic certifying agent or inspection agent approved by the national organic program.

(4) The director may adopt rules necessary to implement the brand name materials list, including but not limited to:

(a) Fees related to registration;

(b) The number and scheduling of inspections, both announced and unannounced;

(c) Recordkeeping requirements;

(d) Additional application requirements;

(e) Labeling of registered materials; and

(f) Chemical analysis of material samples.

(5)(a) The department may establish a brand name materials list to register materials approved for use under:

(i) National organic program standards; or

(ii) International or additional organic standards.

(b) The director may review materials registered on the brand name materials list as approved for use under the national organic program for compliance with specific international or additional organic standards as designated by rule. A registered material that complies with a specific international or additional organic standard may also be registered as approved under that standard.

(6) Registration of a material on the brand name materials list under this chapter does not guarantee acceptance for use in organic production or processing by organic certifying agents other than the department. The department is not liable for any losses or damage that occurs as a result of use of a material registered on the brand name materials list.

(7) The director may deny, suspend, or revoke a registration on the brand name materials list if the director determines that a registrant has:

(a) Failed to meet the registration criteria established in this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter; or

(b) Violated any other provision of this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

[ 2010 c 109 s 9.]